Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1008
Benefits; proof of insurance coverage or ability to pay; documentation.

A rural or suburban fire protection district, airport authority, city, village, or nonprofit corporation, if it provides benefits pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of section 35-1005, shall maintain proof of insurance coverage that meets the requirements of the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act or shall maintain satisfactory proof of the ability to pay such compensation to ensure adequate coverage for all firefighters. Sufficient documentation of satisfactory proof of the ability to pay such compensation to ensure adequate coverage for all firefighters shall be required and shall comply with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Fire Marshal. Such coverage shall remain in effect until thirty-six months after the rural or suburban fire protection district, airport authority, city, village, or nonprofit corporation no longer has any firefighters who could qualify for benefits under the act.

Laws 2021, LB432, § 7.